Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 11 FINANCIAL POWERS
32-1-1103. Special financial provisions - health service districts.

In addition to the powers specified in section 32-1-1101, the board of any health service district has the following powers for and on behalf of such district:

Repealed.

To levy, in health service districts with a valuation for assessment on real and personal property of fifteen million dollars or less contracting bonded indebtedness not to exceed three percent of the total valuation for assessment within the health service district to be fully paid within a twenty-year period from the date of incurring the indebtedness, on all taxable property within such district without limitations as to rate or amount for purposes of retiring the indebtedness created in accordance with the provisions of section 32-1-1101 (2);

To levy, in health service districts with a valuation for assessment on real and personal property of over fifteen million dollars contracting bonded indebtedness not to exceed five percent of the total valuation for assessment within the health service district to be fully paid within a twenty-year period from the date of incurring the indebtedness, on all taxable property within such district without limitations as to rate or amount for purposes of retiring the indebtedness created in accordance with the provisions of section 32-1-1101 (2);

To levy, in health service districts with a population of twenty thousand or less with a valuation for assessment on real and personal property of over fifteen million dollars contracting bonded indebtedness not to exceed twenty percent of the total valuation for assessment within the health service district to be fully paid within a twenty-year period from the date of incurring the indebtedness, on all taxable property within such district without limitations as to rate or amount for purposes of retiring the indebtedness created in accordance with the provisions of section 32-1-1101 (2);

To issue without an election, pursuant to an authorizing resolution and subject to the provisions and contractual limitations in resolutions authorizing outstanding bonds and other securities of the health service district, securities to defray, in whole or in part, the cost of a project in the manner provided in and subject to the limitations imposed by subsection (3) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, all moneys belonging to or collected on behalf of the health service district shall be deposited, in the discretion of the board, with either the treasurer of the county in which the greatest percentage of the valuation for assessment of the taxable property of the district is located or in a depository enumerated in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., to the account of the health service district. All expenditures therefrom of the moneys shall be made upon warrants or checks duly drawn on said account and signed by the president and secretary-treasurer of the health service district. The board may invest any moneys of the district not required to meet the immediate expenses of the district in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

The project for which securities are issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section may be the acquisition, by purchase, construction, or otherwise, the improvement, or the equipment, or any combination thereof, for the purposes set forth in section 32-1-1003 (1)(a) or any other building, structure, or land necessary or desirable for use in connection with the operations of a health service district.
(3) (a) (I) The project for which securities are issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section may be the acquisition, by purchase, construction, or otherwise, the improvement, or the equipment, or any combination thereof, for the purposes set forth in section 32-1-1003 (1)(a) or any other building, structure, or land necessary or desirable for use in connection with the operations of a health service district.

The cost of the project may include, in the board's discretion, all incidental costs pertaining to the project and the financing thereof, including, without limitation, contingencies and the capitalization, with proceeds of securities, of operation and maintenance expenses appertaining to facilities to be acquired and interest on the securities for any period not exceeding the period estimated by the board to effect the project plus one year, of any discount on the securities, and of any reserves for payment of principal of and interest on the securities.

The board may issue interim securities, which may be designated "bonds", "notes", or "warrants", evidencing any emergency loans, construction loans, and other temporary loans not exceeding three years, in supplementation of long-term financing, such interim securities to be funded with the proceeds of long-term securities, net pledged revenues, or further interim securities, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

Except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this section, any securities issued pursuant to this section for any project shall be issued in the form and manner and with the effect provided in sections 11-54-111 and 11-54-112, C.R.S., for public securities issued under the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law".

The authorizing resolution, trust indenture, or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any of the covenants, and the board may do such acts and things, as are permitted in section 11-54-113, C.R.S.

Revenue obligations issued to refund revenue bonds of a health service district and to refund securities issued under this section may be issued under the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law".

The securities shall be payable and collectible, as to principal, interest, and any prior redemption premium, solely out of net pledged revenues, and the holder thereof may not look to any general or other fund for the payment of such securities except the net revenues pledged therefor. The securities shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation, if any provision or limitation appertains thereto. The securities shall not be considered or held to be general obligations of the health service district but shall constitute its special obligations, and the full faith and credit of the health service district shall not be pledged for their payment. The payment shall not be secured by an encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the health service district, except for its pledged revenues. No property of the health service district, subject to said exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of securities.

A resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or other securities under this section or an indenture or other proceedings appertaining thereto may provide that the securities contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this section, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

The determination of the board that the limitations imposed under this subsection (3) upon the issuance of securities under this section have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion, regardless of whether the authorizing resolution or the securities thereby authorized contain a recital as authorized by paragraph (e) of this subsection (3).

Nothing in this section or in any other law shall be deemed to impair the existing obligations of contract embodied in outstanding bonds validly issued under the statutes in force at the times of their issue prior to July 1, 1971.

Bonds and other securities issued under the provisions of this section, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall forever remain free and exempt from taxation by this state or any political subdivision thereof.

This section, without reference to other statutes of this state, except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, constitutes full authority for the exercise of the incidental powers granted in this section concerning the borrowing of money to defray wholly or in part the cost of any project and the issuance of securities to evidence such loans.

The powers conferred by this section are in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this section shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the exercise of any power granted to the board or to a health service district acting by and through its board or any officer, agent, or employee thereof by any other law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1605, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1069, § 1, effective March 26; (1)(a)(I) repealed, pp. 1027, 1030, §§ 8, 16, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1134, § 82, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(a)(IV) added, p. 793, § 21, effective June 4.

L. 96:

IP(1), (1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(III), (1)(a)(IV), (1)(b), (2), (3)(a)(I), (3)(c)(III), (3)(d), and (3)(i)(III) amended, p. 475, § 17, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law", see article 54 of title 11.

32-1-1104. Special financial provisions - park and recreation districts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1607, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section repealed, p. 1027, § 8, effective January 1, 1987.

32-1-1105. Special financial provisions - tunnel districts.

In addition to the powers specified in section 32-1-1101, the board of any tunnel district has the following powers for and on behalf of such district:

To fix and from time to time increase or decrease tolls or other charges for the use of any tunnel and to pledge the same for the payment of principal of and interest and any prior redemption premium on any securities or other obligations of the tunnel district issued in connection with the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipping, operation, maintenance, or financing of a tunnel located in whole or in part within such tunnel district;

To issue without an election, pursuant to an authorizing resolution and subject to the provisions and contractual limitations and resolutions authorizing outstanding bonds and other securities of the tunnel district, securities to defray, in whole or in part, the costs of one or more tunnel projects in the manner provided in and subject to the limitations imposed by subsection (2) of this section;

To invest or deposit moneys belonging to or collected by and on behalf of the tunnel district in accordance with the requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. In addition, a tunnel district may direct a corporate trustee which holds funds of the tunnel district to invest or deposit such funds in investments or deposits other than those specified by said part 6 if the board determines by resolution that such investments or deposits meet the standard established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S., if the income is at least comparable to income available on investments or deposits specified by said part 6, and if such investments will assist the tunnel district in the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipping, operation, maintenance, or financing of a tunnel.

The tunnel project for which securities are issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section may be the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipping, operation, or maintenance, or any combination thereof, of any land, tunnel, building, structure, equipment, or other property necessary or desirable for use in connection with the operations of a tunnel district.
(2) (a) (I) The tunnel project for which securities are issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section may be the acquisition, construction, improvement, equipping, operation, or maintenance, or any combination thereof, of any land, tunnel, building, structure, equipment, or other property necessary or desirable for use in connection with the operations of a tunnel district.

The cost of the project may include, in the board's discretion, all incidental costs pertaining to the project and the financing thereof, including, without limitation, contingencies and the capitalization, with proceeds of securities, of operation and maintenance expenses appertaining to the tunnel project and interest on the securities for any period not exceeding the period estimated by the board to effect the acquisition, construction, improvement, or equipping of the tunnel project plus one year, of any discount on the securities, and of any reserves for payment of principal of and interest on the securities.

The board may issue interim securities, which may be designated "bonds", "notes", or "warrants", evidencing any emergency loans, any acquisition, construction, improvement, equipping, operation, or maintenance loans, and any other temporary loans not exceeding three years in supplementation of long-term financing, such interim securities to be funded with the proceeds of long-term securities, net pledged revenues, or further interim securities, or any combination thereof, as the board may determine.

Except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this section, any securities issued pursuant to this section for any tunnel project shall be issued in the form and manner and with the effect provided in sections 11-54-111 and 11-54-112, C.R.S., for public securities issued under the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law", article 54 of title 11, C.R.S.

The authorizing resolution, trust indenture, or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any of the covenants, and the board may do such acts and things, as are permitted in section 11-54-113, C.R.S.

Revenue obligations issued to refund revenue bonds of a tunnel district and to refund securities issued under this section may be issued under the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law", article 54 of title 11, C.R.S.

The securities shall be payable and collectible, as to principal, interest, and any prior redemption premium, solely out of net pledged revenues, and the holder thereof may not look to any general or other fund for such payment of such securities except the net revenues pledged therefor. The securities shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation if any such provision or limitation appertains thereto. The securities shall not be considered or held to be general obligations of the tunnel district but shall constitute its special obligations, and the full faith and credit of the tunnel district shall not be pledged for their payment. Such payment shall not be secured by an encumbrance, a mortgage, or any other pledge of property of the tunnel district, except for its pledged revenues. No property of the tunnel district, subject to said exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of securities.

A resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or other securities under this section or an indenture or other proceedings appertaining thereto may provide that the securities contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this section, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

The determination of the board that the limitations imposed under this subsection (2) upon the issuance of securities under this section have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion, regardless of whether the authorizing resolution or the securities thereby authorized contain a recital as authorized by paragraph (e) of this subsection (2).

Bonds and other securities issued under the provisions of this section, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall forever remain free and exempt from taxation by this state or any political subdivision thereof.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, this section, without reference to other statutes of this state, constitutes full authority for the exercise of the incidental powers granted in this section concerning the borrowing of money to defray, in whole or in part, the cost of any tunnel project and the issuance of securities to evidence such loans.

The powers conferred by this section are in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this section shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the exercise of any power granted to the board or to a tunnel district acting by and through its board or any officer, agent, or employee thereof by any other law.

The state hereby pledges and agrees with the holders of any bonds or other obligations issued by any tunnel district that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested in the tunnel district to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds or other securities authorized and issued pursuant to the provisions of this section. The state further agrees that it will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of any bonds or securities of the tunnel district until such bonds or securities have been paid or until adequate provision for payment thereof has been made. The tunnel district may include this provision and undertaking of the state in such bonds or other securities.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1233, § 4, effective May 13.

L. 89:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1117, § 35, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) was originally numbered as subsection (5) by chapter 242, Session Laws of Colorado 1987, p. 1233, but was renumbered on revision.

32-1-1106. Special financial provisions - metropolitan districts that provide fire protection, street improvement, safety protection, or transportation services.

In addition to the powers specified in section 32-1-1101, the board of a metropolitan district organized with fire protection, street improvement, safety protection, or transportation powers as described in section 32-1-1004 (2)(a), (2)(d), (2)(f), (2)(h), and (5) has the power, for and on behalf of the district, to levy a uniform sales tax, at a rate determined by the board, upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is levied by the state that occurs within any area of the district that is not also within the boundaries of an incorporated municipality subject to the following limitations:

The board may levy the tax only if the question of levying the tax is submitted to and approved by a majority of the registered electors of the portion of the district in which the tax is to be levied voting at a regular district election or at a special election held on the Tuesday after the first Monday of November in an even-numbered year or on the first Tuesday of November in an odd-numbered year in accordance with this article and section 20 of article X of the state constitution. The ballot issue shall provide that the tax to be levied shall be in addition to any other taxes levied by the district. The district shall pay all costs of the election, and no district moneys may be used to urge or oppose passage of the ballot issue submitted at the election.

The net revenues of any sales or use tax levied may be used only to fund one or more of the following:

Safety protection, as described in section 32-1-1004 (2)(d), in areas of the district in which the tax is to be levied;

Street improvement, as described in section 32-1-1004 (2)(f), in areas of the district in which the tax is to be levied;

Transportation, as described in, and limited by the provisions of, section 32-1-1004 (2)(h) and (5); or

Fire protection, as described in section 32-1-1004 (2)(a), in areas of the district in which the tax is to be levied.

The collection, administration, and enforcement of any sales tax levied by a metropolitan district pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as that for the collection, administration, and enforcement of the state sales tax levied pursuant to article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., including, without limitation, the retention by a vendor of the percentage of the amount remitted to cover the vendor's expense in the collection and remittance of the sales tax as provided in section 39-26-105, C.R.S. The executive director shall make monthly distributions of sales tax collections to the district. The district shall pay the net incremental cost incurred by the department in the administration and collection of the sales tax.

A qualified purchaser may provide a direct payment permit number issued pursuant to section 39-26-103.5, C.R.S., to a vendor or retailer that is liable and responsible for collecting and remitting any sales tax levied on a sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article. A vendor or retailer that has received a direct payment permit number in good faith from a qualified purchaser shall not be liable or responsible for collection and remittance of any sales tax levied on a sale that is paid for directly from the qualified purchaser's funds and not the personal funds of an individual.

A qualified purchaser that provides a direct payment permit number to a vendor or retailer shall be liable and responsible for the amount of sales tax levied on a sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article in the same manner as liability would be levied on a qualified purchaser for state sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-105 (3), C.R.S.

Revenues raised by a metropolitan district through the levy of a sales tax pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be in addition to and shall not be used to supplant any state funding that the district or any county, municipality, regional transportation authority, or other governmental entity that has transportation-related powers and that includes territory located within the district would otherwise be entitled to receive from the state or any other local government, including, but not limited to, any existing or budgeted department of transportation funding of any portion of the state highway system within the territory of the authority.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1243), ch. 385, p. 1802, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 689, § 42, effective May 17.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1047), ch. 39, p. 133, § 1, effective August 2.